Utah statutes.
20A-1-604.   Destroying instruction cards, sample ballots, or election
paraphernalia -- Penalties.
(1)  A person may not:
(a)  willfully deface or destroy any list of candidates posted in accordance
with the provisions of this title;
(b)  willfully deface, tear down, remove or destroy any card of instruction or
sample ballot, printed or posted for the instruction of voters during an
election;
(c)  willfully remove or destroy any of the supplies or conveniences furnished
to enable a voter to prepare the voter's ballot during an election; or
(d)  willfully hinder the voting of others.
(2)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person
who commits an offense under Subsection (1) is guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
